Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.8022

Exemption—Informational or educational meetings regarding legislative issues.

This chapter does not prohibit state employees from attending informational or educational meetings regarding legislative issues with a legislator or other elected official. It is not a violation of this chapter to hold such meetings in public facilities, including state-owned or leased buildings. This section is not intended to allow the use of state facilities for a political campaign or for the promotion of or opposition to a ballot proposition.

[ 2011 c 63 s 1.]